Utah statutes.
20A-11-603.   Criminal penalties -- Fines.

(1) (a)  Each political action committee that fails to file a financial statement by the deadline is subject to a fine imposed in accordance with Section 20A-11-1005.

(b)  Each political action committee that fails to file the financial statement due before the regular primary election, on August 31, before the municipal general election, or before the regular general election is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (1)(b) to the attorney general.

(2)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of the January 10 statement required by this part, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed statement to ensure that:

(a)  each political action committee that is required to file a statement has filed one; and

(b)  each statement contains the information required by this part.

(3)  If it appears that any political action committee has failed to file the January 10 statement, if it appears that a filed statement does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any statement, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the political action committee of the violation or written complaint and direct the political action committee to file a statement correcting the problem.

(4) (a)  It is unlawful for any political action committee to fail to file or amend a statement within seven days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section.

(b)  Each political action committee that violates Subsection (4)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (4)(a) to the attorney general.

(d)  In addition to the criminal penalty described in Subsection (4)(b), the lieutenant governor shall impose a civil fine of $1,000 against a political action committee that violates Subsection (4)(a).



Amended by Chapter 252, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 420, 2013 General Session

